Utah statutes.
53B-17-101.   Legislative findings on public broadcasting and telecommunications for education.

The Legislature finds and determines the following:

(1)  The University of Utah's Dolores Dore' Eccles Broadcast Center is the statewide public broadcasting and telecommunications facility for education in Utah.

(2)  The center shall provide services to citizens of the state in cooperation with higher and public education, state and local government, and private industry.

(3)  Distribution services provided through the center shall include KUED - TV, KUER - FM, and KUEN - TV.

(4)  KUED - TV and KUER - FM are licensed to the University of Utah.

(5) The Utah Education Network's broadcast entity, KUEN - TV, is licensed to the Utah State Board of Regents and, together with UEN, is operated on behalf of the state's systems of public and higher education.

(6)  All the entities referred to in Subsection (3) are under the administrative supervision of the University of Utah, subject to the authority and governance of the State Board of Regents.

(7)  This section neither regulates nor restricts a privately owned company in the distribution or dissemination of educational programs.

